Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2584 (2) 91 as/js/md H.F. 2584 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 716.15 Drug-free homeless service 1 zones. 2 1. A person commits a violation of this section if the 3 person intentionally or knowingly does any of the following: 4 a. The person is present within a drug-free homeless 5 service zone and unlawfully sells or transfers or attempts to 6 unlawfully sell or transfer a controlled substance. 7 b. The person operates or has authority to enforce the 8 policies and requirements of a facility-based drug-free 9 homeless service zone that primarily serves homeless 10 individuals and that receives state, local, or federal funding, 11 and the person allows an individual accessing services to 12 unlawfully possess or use a controlled substance on the 13 premises of the facility. 14 2. An offense under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , is 15 punishable as the same class of criminal violation for which 16 the offense would be punishable under existing law had the 17 violation not occurred within a drug-free homeless service 18 zone, except that the presumptive, minimum, and maximum 19 sentence for the offense shall be increased by one year. 20 The additional sentence imposed under this subsection is in 21 addition to any enhanced punishment that may be applicable 22 under subsection 4. Notwithstanding any other law to the 23 contrary, a person convicted under this section is not eligible 24 for a deferred judgment, a deferred or suspended sentence, 25 probation, or work release. 26 3. A person who is convicted of a violation of subsection 1, 27 paragraph âbâ , is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 28 4. An operator of a facility-based drug-free homeless 29 service zone who violates subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , is 30 ineligible to apply for homelessness assistance grants from the 31 state for a period of three years from the date of conviction 32 unless the operator terminates the employment of any employee 33 or volunteer who commits a violation of subsection 1, paragraph 34 âbâ . 35 -1- HF 2584 (2) 91 as/js/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2584 5. In addition to any other penalty, a person convicted 1 of an offense under this title shall be punished by a fine of 2 not less than two thousand dollars or three times the value 3 as determined by the court of the drugs involved in or giving 4 rise to the offense, whichever is greater. No fine under 5 this subsection shall be suspended, in part or whole, for any 6 reason. 7 6. a. Each operator of a facility-based service that 8 primarily serve homeless individuals shall place and maintain 9 permanently affixed signs located in a conspicuous manner 10 clearly visible to the public at the main entrance of the 11 facility that identifies the building and its accompanying 12 grounds as a drug-free homeless service zone. Such signs shall 13 be written in both English and Spanish and in contrasting 14 colors with block letters at least one inch in height. 15 b. If the facility-based service provides shelter or 16 housing for children or victims of domestic violence that 17 may be endangered if the purpose or location of the facility 18 became known, at least one sign shall be permanently affixed 19 in a visible manner inside the building within five feet of 20 the main entrance of the facility that identifies the building 21 and its accompanying grounds as a drug-free homeless service 22 zone. Such signs shall be written in both English and Spanish 23 and in contrasting colors with block letters at least one inch 24 in height. 25 7. For the purposes of this section: 26 a. âDrug-free homeless service zoneâ means the area within 27 three hundred feet of the premises of a facility-based service. 28 b. âFacility-based serviceâ means any emergency or temporary 29 shelter, transitional housing provider, or operator-owned 30 permanent supportive housing entity that receives government 31 funding for the purpose of providing shelter to homeless 32 persons. 33 c. âOperatorâ means the sole proprietorship, organization, 34 association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited 35 -2- HF 2584 (2) 91 as/js/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2584 partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability 1 company, or other entity or business association that is the 2 direct recipient of government funding for the provision of 3 facility-based services. 4 -3- HF 2584 (2) 91 as/js/md 3/ 3